Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE E. GOVERNMENT PROPERTY

CHAPTER 2201. TEXAS CAPITAL TRUST FUND

Sec. 2201.001. TEXAS CAPITAL TRUST FUND. The Texas capital trust fund is in the state treasury.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2201.002. USE OF FUND. The fund may be used to finance:

(1) the acquisition, construction, repair, improvement, or equipping of a building by a state agency for a state purpose;

(2) the acquisition of real or personal property necessary for a state agency to take an action described by Subdivision (1);

(3) the administration of the asset management division of the General Land Office; or

(4) any other purpose for which funds may be appropriated from general revenue.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1499, Sec. 1.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 59, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 2201.003. TRANSFERS FROM CAPITAL TRUST FUND. (a) Interest earned by the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the housing trust fund.

(b) At the end of each fiscal biennium the unencumbered balance of the fund shall be transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1123, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 60, eff. June 20, 2003.